South Dakota, session 2026, HB1109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-19A:
If the court dismisses a petition filed pursuant to § 22-19A-8, either initially or
after a hearing held pursuant to § 22-19A-10, the court may then grant the expungement,
as defined by § 23A-3-26, of all records pertinent to the court file, including any on file
with the Department of Social Services.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 25-10:
If the court dismisses a petition filed pursuant to § 25-10-3, either initially or after
a hearing held pursuant to § 25-10-4, the court may then grant the expungement, as
defined by § 23A-3-26, of all records pertinent to the court file, including any on file with
the Department of Social Services.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.